Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.350

Permit to condition certified seed.

Upon application for a permit to condition certified seed, the department shall inspect the seed conditioning facilities of the applicant to determine that genetic purity and identity of seed conditioned can be maintained. Upon approval, the department shall issue a seed conditioning permit, for each regular place of business, which shall be conspicuously displayed in the office of such business. The permit shall remain in effect as long as the facilities comply with the department's requirements for such permit.

[ 1981 c 297 s 13; 1969 c 63 s 35.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 297: See note following RCW 15.36.201.